Illinois, session 104th, SB1642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 602.9 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/602.9)7    Sec. 602.9. Visitation by certain non-parents.8    (a) As used in this Section:9        (1) "electronic communication" means time that a 10    grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or step-parent 11    spends with a child during which the child is not in the 12    person's actual physical custody, but which is facilitated 13    by the use of communication tools such as the telephone, 14    electronic mail, instant messaging, video conferencing or 15    other wired or wireless technologies via the Internet, or 16    another medium of communication;17        (2) "sibling" means a brother or sister either of the 18    whole blood or the half blood, stepbrother, or stepsister 19    of the minor child;20        (3) "step-parent" means a person married to a child's 21    parent, including a person married to the child's parent 22    immediately prior to the parent's death; and23        (4) "visitation" means in-person time spent between a   SB1642- 2 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1    child and the child's grandparent, great-grandparent, 2    sibling, step-parent, or any person designated under 3    subsection (d) of Section 602.7. In appropriate 4    circumstances, visitation may include electronic 5    communication under conditions and at times determined by 6    the court. 7    (b) General provisions. 8        (1) An appropriate person, as identified in subsection 9    (c) of this Section, may bring an action in circuit court 10    by petition, or by filing a petition in a pending 11    dissolution proceeding or any other proceeding that 12    involves parental responsibilities or visitation issues 13    regarding the child, requesting visitation with the child 14    pursuant to this Section. If there is not a pending 15    proceeding involving parental responsibilities or 16    visitation with the child, the petition for visitation 17    with the child must be filed in the county in which the 18    child resides. Notice of the petition shall be given as 19    provided in subsection (c) of Section 601.2 of this Act.20        (2) This Section does not apply to a child:21            (A) in whose interests a petition is pending under 22        Section 2-13 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; or23            (B) in whose interests a petition to adopt by an 24        unrelated person is pending under the Adoption Act; or25            (C) who has been voluntarily surrendered by the 26        parent or parents, except for a surrender to the   SB1642- 3 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1        Department of Children and Family Services or a foster 2        care facility; or3            (D) who has been previously adopted by an 4        individual or individuals who are not related to the 5        biological parents of the child or who is the subject 6        of a pending adoption petition by an individual or 7        individuals who are not related to the biological 8        parents of the child; or9            (E) who has been relinquished pursuant to the 10        Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.11        (3) A petition for visitation may be filed under this 12    Section only if there has been an unreasonable denial of 13    visitation by a parent and the denial has caused the child 14    undue mental, physical, or emotional harm.15        (4) There is a rebuttable presumption that a fit 16    parent's actions and decisions regarding grandparent, 17    great-grandparent, sibling, or step-parent visitation are 18    not harmful to the child's mental, physical, or emotional 19    health. The burden is on the party filing a petition under 20    this Section to prove that the parent's actions and 21    decisions regarding visitation will cause undue harm to 22    the child's mental, physical, or emotional health.23        (5) In determining whether to grant visitation, the 24    court shall consider the following:25            (A) the wishes of the child, taking into account 26        the child's maturity and ability to express reasoned   SB1642- 4 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1        and independent preferences as to visitation;2            (B) the mental and physical health of the child;3            (C) the mental and physical health of the 4        grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or 5        step-parent;6            (D) the length and quality of the prior 7        relationship between the child and the grandparent, 8        great-grandparent, sibling, or step-parent;9            (E) the good faith of the party in filing the 10        petition;11            (F) the good faith of the person denying 12        visitation;13            (G) the quantity of the visitation time requested 14        and the potential adverse impact that visitation would 15        have on the child's customary activities;16            (H) any other fact that establishes that the loss 17        of the relationship between the petitioner and the 18        child is likely to unduly harm the child's mental, 19        physical, or emotional health; and20            (I) whether visitation can be structured in a way 21        to minimize the child's exposure to conflicts between 22        the adults.23        (6) Any visitation rights granted under this Section 24    before the filing of a petition for adoption of the child 25    shall automatically terminate by operation of law upon the 26    entry of an order terminating parental rights or granting   SB1642- 5 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1    the adoption of the child, whichever is earlier. If the 2    person or persons who adopted the child are related to the 3    child, as defined by Section 1 of the Adoption Act, any 4    person who was related to the child as grandparent, 5    great-grandparent, or sibling prior to the adoption shall 6    have standing to bring an action under this Section 7    requesting visitation with the child.8        (7) The court may order visitation rights for the 9    grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or step-parent 10    that include reasonable access without requiring overnight 11    or possessory visitation. 12    (c) Visitation by grandparents, great-grandparents, 13step-parents, and siblings.14        (1) Grandparents, great-grandparents, step-parents, 15    and siblings of a minor child who is one year old or older 16    may bring a petition for visitation and electronic 17    communication under this Section if there is an 18    unreasonable denial of visitation by a parent that causes 19    undue mental, physical, or emotional harm to the child and 20    if at least one of the following conditions exists:21            (A) the child's other parent is deceased or has 22        been missing for at least 90 days. For the purposes of 23        this subsection a parent is considered to be missing 24        if the parent's location has not been determined and 25        the parent has been reported as missing to a law 26        enforcement agency; or  SB1642- 6 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1            (B) a parent of the child is incompetent as a 2        matter of law; or3            (C) a parent has been incarcerated in jail or 4        prison for a period in excess of 90 days immediately 5        prior to the filing of the petition; or6            (D) the child's parents have been granted a 7        dissolution of marriage or have been legally separated 8        from each other or there is pending a dissolution 9        proceeding involving a parent of the child or another 10        court proceeding involving parental responsibilities 11        or visitation of the child (other than an adoption 12        proceeding of an unrelated child, a proceeding under 13        Article II of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or an 14        action for an order of protection under the Illinois 15        Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or Article 112A of the 16        Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963) and at least one 17        parent does not object to the grandparent, 18        great-grandparent, step-parent, or sibling having 19        visitation with the child. The visitation of the 20        grandparent, great-grandparent, step-parent, or 21        sibling must not diminish the parenting time of the 22        parent who is not related to the grandparent, 23        great-grandparent, step-parent, or sibling seeking 24        visitation; or25            (E) (i) the child is born to parents who are not 26        married to each other; (ii) the parents are not living   SB1642- 7 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1        together; (iii) the petitioner is a grandparent, 2        great-grandparent, step-parent, or sibling of the 3        child; and (iv) the parent-child relationship has been 4        legally established. For purposes of this subdivision 5        (E), if the petitioner is a grandparent or 6        great-grandparent, the parent-child relationship need 7        be legally established only with respect to the parent 8        who is related to the grandparent or 9        great-grandparent. For purposes of this subdivision 10        (E), if the petitioner is a step-parent, the 11        parent-child relationship need be legally established 12        only with respect to the parent who is married to the 13        petitioner or was married to the petitioner 14        immediately before the parent's death.15        (2) In addition to the factors set forth in 16    subdivision (b)(5) of this Section, the court should 17    consider:18            (A) whether the child resided with the petitioner 19        for at least 6 consecutive months with or without a 20        parent present;21            (B) whether the child had frequent and regular 22        contact or visitation with the petitioner for at least 23        12 consecutive months; and24            (C) whether the grandparent, great-grandparent, 25        sibling, or step-parent was a primary caretaker of the 26        child for a period of not less than 6 consecutive   SB1642- 8 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1        months within the 24-month period immediately 2        preceding the commencement of the proceeding; and3            (D) whether there exist any other facts that 4        establish that the loss of the relationship between 5        the grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or 6        step-parent and the child is likely to harm the child.7        (3) An order granting visitation privileges under this 8    Section is subject to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 9    603.10.10        (4) A petition for visitation privileges may not be 11    filed pursuant to this subsection (c) by the parents or 12    grandparents of a parent of the child if parentage between 13    the child and the related parent has not been legally 14    established.15    (d) Modification of visitation orders.16        (1) Unless by stipulation of the parties, no motion to 17    modify a grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or 18    step-parent visitation order may be made earlier than 2 19    years after the date the order was filed, unless the court 20    permits it to be made on the basis of affidavits that there 21    is reason to believe the child's present environment may 22    endanger seriously the child's mental, physical, or 23    emotional health.24        (2) The court shall not modify an order that grants 25    visitation to a grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, 26    or step-parent unless it finds by clear and convincing   SB1642- 9 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1    evidence, upon the basis of facts that have arisen since 2    the prior visitation order or that were unknown to the 3    court at the time of entry of the prior visitation order, 4    that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the 5    child or his or her parent, and that the modification is 6    necessary to protect the mental, physical, or emotional 7    health of the child. The court shall state in its decision 8    specific findings of fact in support of its modification 9    or termination of the grandparent, great-grandparent, 10    sibling, or step-parent visitation. A child's parent may 11    always petition to modify visitation upon changed 12    circumstances when necessary to promote the child's best 13    interests.14        (3) Notice of a motion requesting modification of a 15    visitation order shall be provided as set forth in 16    subsection (c) of Section 601.2 of this Act.17        (4) Attorney's fees and costs shall be assessed 18    against a party seeking modification of the visitation 19    order if the court finds that the modification action is 20    vexatious and constitutes harassment.21    (e) No child's grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or 22step-parent, or any person to whom the court is considering 23granting visitation privileges pursuant to subsection (d) of 24Section 602.7, who was convicted of any offense involving an 25illegal sex act perpetrated upon a victim less than 18 years of 26age including, but not limited to, offenses for violations of   SB1642- 10 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1Section 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-1.70, 2or Article 12 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 3of 2012, is entitled to visitation while incarcerated or while 4on parole, probation, conditional discharge, periodic 5imprisonment, or mandatory supervised release for that 6offense, and upon discharge from incarceration for a 7misdemeanor offense or upon discharge from parole, probation, 8conditional discharge, periodic imprisonment, or mandatory 9supervised release for a felony offense. Visitation shall be 10denied until the person successfully completes a treatment 11program approved by the court. Upon completion of treatment, 12the court may deny visitation based on the factors listed in 13subdivision (b)(5) of this Section.14    (f) No child's grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, or 15step-parent, or any person to whom the court is considering 16granting visitation privileges pursuant to subsection (d) of 17Section 602.7, may be granted visitation if he or she has been 18convicted of first degree murder of a parent, grandparent, 19great-grandparent, or sibling of the child who is the subject 20of the visitation request. Pursuant to a motion to modify 21visitation, the court shall revoke visitation rights 22previously granted to any person who would otherwise be 23entitled to petition for visitation rights under this Section 24or granted visitation under subsection (d) of Section 602.7, 25if the person has been convicted of first degree murder of a 26parent, grandparent, great-grandparent, or sibling of the   SB1642- 11 -LRB104 03764 JRC 13788 b1child who is the subject of the visitation order. Until an 2order is entered pursuant to this subsection, no person may 3visit, with the child present, a person who has been convicted 4of first degree murder of the parent, grandparent, 5great-grandparent, or sibling of the child without the consent 6of the child's parent, other than a parent convicted of first 7degree murder as set forth herein, or legal guardian. 8(Source: P.A. 99-90, eff. 1-1-16; 99-763, eff. 1-1-17; 9100-706, eff. 1-1-19.)